Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1404
Construction against implicit repeal.

The Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it is to be construed as impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 3.